Virginia statutes. Title 52. Police (State).
Chapter 1. Department of State Police.
§ 52-8.4:2.
Certain offenses to be considered traffic infractions.

Notwithstanding subsection C of §

52-8.4

, any violation of any of the following provisions of the regulations adopted pursuant to §

52-8.4

shall constitute traffic infractions as defined in §

46.2-100

and shall be eligible for designation as traffic infractions for which a pretrial waiver of appearance, plea of guilty, and fine payment may be accepted pursuant to § 16.1-69.40:1.

DESCRIPTION OF OFFENSE
CORRESPONDING SECTION
OF THE CODE OF FEDERAL
REGULATIONS (a) General Violations Marking of motor vehicle
49 C.F.R. § 390.21 Railroad crossing/ stopping
49 C.F.R. § 392.10 (b) Driver Violations No medical examiner’s certificate
49 C.F.R. § 391.41 Improper medical examiner’s certificate
49 C.F.R. § 391.43 Medical certificate invalid
49 C.F.R. § 391.43 No medical waiver
49 C.F.R. § 391.49 Ill/fatigued driver
49 C.F.R. § 392.3 Possess alcoholic beverage
49 C.F.R. § 392.5 Hearing aid to be worn
49 C.F.R. § 391.41 Violate 10-hour rule, 15-hour rule
49 C.F.R. § 395.3 Violate 60/70-hour rule
49 C.F.R. § 395.3 Logbook violation (general)
49 C.F.R. § 395.8 No logbook
49 C.F.R. § 395.8 Logbook not current
49 C.F.R. § 395.8 Fail to retain previous 7 days on logbook
49 C.F.R. § 395.8 (c) Equipment Violations Equipment-inspection/use
49 C.F.R. § 392.7 Emergency equipment-inspection/use
49 C.F.R. § 392.8 Safe loading (secured)
49 C.F.R. § 392.9 Brakes-inoperative or missing
- 49 C.F.R. § 393.40 § 393.52 Fuel tank securement
49 C.F.R. § 393.65 Fuel leak/cap
49 C.F.R. § 393.67 Coupling/towing devices
; § 393.71 49 C.F.R. § 393.70 Tire exceeds weight limit
49 C.F.R. § 393.75 Bus violations
- 49 C.F.R. § 393.89 § 393.92 Front end structure
49 C.F.R. § 393.106 Frame-cracked, loose, sagging, broken
49 C.F.R. § 393.201 Cab/body components-defective
49 C.F.R. § 393.203 Wheels/rims defective
49 C.F.R. § 393.205 Suspension-defective
49 C.F.R. § 393.207 Steering system- defective
49 C.F.R. § 393.209 Vehicle maintenance (general)
49 C.F.R. § 396.3 No driver vehicle inspection report
49 C.F.R. § 396.11 No periodic inspection
- 49 C.F.R. § 396.17 § 396.25 (d) Hazardous Materials; Driving and Parking Fail to attend Division 1.1, 1.2, or 1.3 material
49 C.F.R. § 397.5 Fail to attend other hazardous materials class
49 C.F.R. § 397.5 Improper parking Division 1.1, 1.2, or 1.3 material
; § 397.11 49 C.F.R. § 397.7 Improper parking other hazardous materials
; § 397.11 49 C.F.R. § 397.7 Fail to have route plan
49 C.F.R. § 397.67 Smoking violations
49 C.F.R. § 397.13 Instructions and document violations
49 C.F.R. § 397.19

Click to view

History.

1997, c. 283.

§ 52-8.5.
Reporting hate crimes.

The Superintendent shall establish and maintain within the Department of State Police a central repository for the collection and analysis of information regarding hate crimes and groups and individuals carrying out such acts.

State, county, and municipal law-enforcement agencies shall report to the Department all hate crimes occurring in their jurisdictions in a form, time, and manner prescribed by the Superintendent. Such reports shall not be open to public inspection except insofar as the Superintendent shall permit.

As used in this section:“Disability” means a physical or mental impairment that substantially limits one or more of a person’s major life activities.“Hate crime” means (i) a criminal act committed against a person or his property with the specific intent of instilling fear or intimidation in the individual against whom the act is perpetrated because of race, religion, gender, disability, gender identity, sexual orientation, or ethnic or national origin or that is committed for the purpose of restraining that person from exercising his rights under the Constitution or laws of the Commonwealth or of the United States; (ii) any illegal act directed against any persons or their property because of those persons’ race, religion, gender, disability, gender identity, sexual orientation, or ethnic or national origin; and (iii) all other incidents, as determined by law-enforcement authorities, intended to intimidate or harass any individual or group because of race, religion, gender, disability, gender identity, sexual orientation, or ethnic or national origin.

History.

1988, c. 838; 2002, cc. 588, 623; 2020, cc. 124, 746, 1171.

Cross references.

As to removal from office of elected and appointed officers by courts, see §

24.2-233

.

As to maintenance of reports by the Disease Prevention and Control regarding the use of biological weapons, see §

32.1-39

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 746 and 1171, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities; therefore, Chapter 854 of the Acts of Assembly of 2019 requires the Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission to assign a minimum fiscal impact of $50,000. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

Acts 2020, c. 746, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not become effective unless an appropriation effectuating the purposes of this act is included in a general appropriation act passed in 2020 by the General Assembly that becomes law.”

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendments by cc. 588 and 623 are identical, and substituted “hate crimes” for “terroristic acts” in the section catchline and in subsections A and B; and in subsection C, substituted “hate crime” for “terroristic act” and substituted “that” for “which” preceding “is committed.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 124, 746 and 1171 are identical and rewrote subsection C, which read: “For purposes of this section, ‘hate crime’ means (i) a criminal act committed against a person or his property with the specific intent of instilling fear or intimidation in the individual against whom the act is perpetrated because of race, religion or ethnic origin or that is committed for the purpose of restraining that person from exercising his rights under the Constitution or laws of this Commonwealth or of the United States, (ii) any illegal act directed against any persons or their property because of those persons’ race, religion or national origin, and (iii) all other incidents, as determined by law-enforcement authorities, intended to intimidate or harass any individual or group because of race, religion or national origin”; and made minor punctuation changes.

Law Review.

For Comment, “Spelling out LGBT: Enumerating Sexual Orientation in Virginia’s Anti-Bullying Law,” 47 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1373 (2013).

§ 52-8.6.
Criminal street gang reporting.

When it is determined, by a state or local law-enforcement agency, regional jail, the Department of Corrections, the Department of Juvenile Justice, or a regional multijurisdictional law-enforcement task force, that a person is a member of a criminal street gang, as defined in §

18.2-46.1

by means of (i) an admission of membership in a gang; (ii) an observation by a law-enforcement officer that a person frequents a known gang area, associates with known gang members and demonstrates gang style of dress, tattoos, hand signals, or symbols; or (iii) being arrested on more than one occasion with known gang members for offenses consistent with gang activities, the agency shall enter the person’s name and other appropriate gang-related information required by the Department of State Police into the information system known as the Organized Criminal Gang File of the Virginia Criminal Information Network (VCIN), established and maintained by the Department pursuant to Chapter 2 (§

52-12

et seq.) of this title, and the Violent Criminal Gang File of the National Crime Information Center (NCIC), maintained by the Federal Bureau of Investigation. The entry shall be made as soon as practicable after determining that a person is a member of an organized criminal gang. All records contained in these information systems shall be entered, retained, and validated in accordance with established VCIN and NCIC policies.

History.

2005, c. 843; 2010, cc. 367, 472.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 367 and 472 are identical, and inserted “the Department of Juvenile Justice” in the first sentence.

§ 52-9.
Administration of oaths; acknowledgments and affidavits; summoning witnesses in certain cases.

All police officers appointed by the Superintendent are vested with the authority and power to administer oaths and take acknowledgments and affidavits incidental to the administration and enforcement of all laws relating to the operation of motor vehicles, applications for driver’s licenses and the collection and refunding of taxes levied on gasoline, for which services they shall receive no compensation.

Any member of the Bureau of Criminal Investigation conducting an investigation may petition an appropriate judicial officer for the issuance of a summons directed to a sheriff of any county or city, police chief of any town, or to any member of the Bureau of Criminal Investigation, commanding the officer to summon witnesses at such time and place as he may direct. Any such officer to whom the summons is delivered shall forthwith execute it, and make return thereof at the time and place named therein.

Any member of the Bureau of Criminal Investigation who is conducting an investigation requested under the provisions of §

52-8.2

or investigating frauds or attempts to defraud the Commonwealth or any of its political subdivisions or investigating criminal misconduct related to official duties of any officer, agent, or employee of the Commonwealth or any of its political subdivisions, upon authorization by the Attorney General or an attorney for the Commonwealth, may administer an oath to any complaining witness who is giving a statement or evidence concerning such investigation. If oath is administered pursuant to this statute it shall be administered prior to the taking of any statement, and any statement taken after such oath shall be reduced to writing and subscribed by the witness.

History.

1932, p. 617; 1934, p. 277; Michie Code 1942, § 2154(53); 1944, p. 204; R.P. 1948, §

52-9

; 1980, c. 228; 1981, c. 223; 1984, c. 780.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

1A M.J. Affidavits, § 3.

§ 52-9.1.
Distinctive uniform to be adopted for State police officers.

The Superintendent of State Police shall cause to be designed and, with the approval of the Governor, adopt a distinctive uniform with appropriate insignia for the use of the police officers appointed by him. Such uniform, when adopted, shall be worn by all such police officers when on patrol duty, and at such other times as the Superintendent may by regulation prescribe.

History.

1950, p. 154; 1973, c. 401.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission for better arrangement, the number of this section in the 1950 act having been 19-75.1.

Cross references.

For provision requiring uniform to be worn at time of making arrest, see §

19.2-78

.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Commemorative badges celebrating the 75th anniversary of the Department of State Police

may be adopted pursuant to this section and with the approval of the Governor. See opinion of Attorney General to Colonel W.S. (Steve) Flaherty, Superintendent, Department of State Police, 06-083 (11/15/06).

§ 52-9.1:1.
Retired and former law-enforcement officers; retention of badge.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, on and after July 1, 1978, every State police officer shall upon retirement be awarded his badge or other insignia of his office for permanent keeping; provided, however, the Superintendent of State Police, prior to tendering such badge or insignia, shall have the same mounted in such a manner that it will be impossible for anyone to display such badge or insignia upon his person.

Upon request of a former law-enforcement officer with at least 10 years of service who has been diagnosed with post-traumatic stress disorder, as defined in §

65.2-107

, by a mental health professional, as defined in §

65.2-107

, or who is disabled, such individual shall be awarded his badge or other insignia of his office in accordance with the procedures established under subsection A; however, the mounted badge or insignia shall include an indication that the individual honorably served. The Superintendent of State Police may deny, for cause, any request made under this subsection, provided that it gives a written explanation to the requester of the grounds for denial. Any individual awarded a badge or insignia under this subsection shall be ineligible to receive a badge or insignia pursuant to subsection A. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to any individual who was decertified pursuant to §

15.2-1707

.

History.

1978, c. 569; 2022, c. 491.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 491 added the subsection A designation and subsection B.

§ 52-9.2.
Wearing of same or similar uniforms by other persons.

When such official uniform has been adopted by the Superintendent, no police officer of any county, city or town, special policeman, guard or other person shall wear any uniform identical with such official uniform or so similar in appearance as to be likely to deceive the casual observer.

Violations of this section or §

52-9.1

shall constitute a misdemeanor and be punished as provided by law.

History.

1950, p. 154.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission for better arrangement, the number of this section in the 1950 act having been 19-75.2.

Cross references.

For other provisions concerning unlawful wearing of officer’s uniform, see §

18.2-175

.

§ 52-10.
Fees and rewards.

No court in the Commonwealth shall in any case, in which a fine is assessed for the violation of any law of the Commonwealth, or any subdivision thereof, assess, as a part of the cost of the case any fee for arrest, or as a witness, for the benefit of any police officer of the Department of State Police; nor shall any such police officer receive any such fee. Any such police officer who accepts or receives any such fee shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not more than $100, and in addition the Superintendent may remove him therefor. But such officers are not prohibited from accepting or receiving rewards.

History.

1932, p. 617; 1934, p. 277; Michie Code 1942, § 2154(53); 1944, p. 204; R.P. 1948, §

52-10

; 2005, c. 839.

Cross references.

As to right of sheriffs, sergeants, their deputies and other officers to receive rewards, see §

19.2-7

.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 839, effective October 1, 2005, in the first sentence, substituted “No court in the Commonwealth shall” for “No trial justice or court, in this Commonwealth, shall” and “the Commonwealth” for “this Commonwealth.”

Law Review.

For comment, “Effect of Public Policy upon Reward Offers,” see 20 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 395 (1963).

§ 52-11.
Defense of police officers.

If any police officer appointed by the Superintendent of State Police shall be brought before any regulatory body, summoned before any grand jury, investigated by any other law-enforcement agency, or arrested or indicted or otherwise prosecuted on any charge arising out of any act committed in the discharge of his official duties, the Superintendent may employ special counsel approved by the Attorney General to defend such officer.
Upon a finding that (i) the officer did not violate a law or regulation resulting from the act which was the subject of the investigation and (ii) the officer will not be terminated from employment as the result of such act, the Superintendent shall pay for the special counsel employed.
The compensation for special counsel employed, pursuant to this section, shall, subject to the approval of the Attorney General, be paid out of the funds appropriated for the administration of the Department of State Police.

History.

1938, p. 491; Michie Code 1942, § 2154(54a); R. P. 1948, §

52-11

; 1958, c. 542; 1991, c. 631.

§ 52-11.1.
State Health Commissioner to cooperate.

The State Health Commissioner shall cause to be furnished to the Department of State Police all such assistance requested by the Superintendent of State Police or the authorized officers and agents of the Department of State Police as may be afforded by the technical staff of the Department of Health and the Chief Medical Examiner.

The State Health Commissioner may, in his discretion, furnish to any other law-enforcement officer or agency, such assistance as is afforded by the technical staff of the Department of Health and the Chief Medical Examiner.

History.

R.P. 1948, §

52-11.1

; 1952, c. 493; 1979, c. 123.

§ 52-11.2.
Services of State Police in areas of counties that have merged, consolidated or been annexed into cities.

When a county or city merges or consolidates into a city, or when a combination of counties and cities merge into a city, or when any county and all of the incorporated towns located entirely therein merge, consolidate or be annexed or when any county or part thereof be annexed into a city or cities, the governing body of any such city may thereafter request of the Superintendent of State Police, and upon such request he shall grant, the services of the Department of State Police in those areas of the counties which were merged, or consolidated or annexed into such city or cities for a period of ten years after the effective date of such merger, consolidation or annexation which were not previously incorporated.

History.

1968, c. 228; 1970, c. 224; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 177; 1991, c. 189.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the 1968 act having assigned no number.

§ 52-11.3.
Acquisition of military property.

The Superintendent of State Police is authorized to apply for and accept grants or loans of personal property from the U.S. Department of Defense for use in the law-enforcement activities of the Department of State Police or any other law-enforcement agency of the Commonwealth or its political subdivisions. In connection with the receipt of such property, the Department of State Police and any other law-enforcement agency to which the property is transferred may agree to hold the United States government harmless against claims for damages arising out of the use of the property received. Such other law-enforcement agencies may also agree to hold the Commonwealth harmless against such claims.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection A, the Superintendent shall not acquire or purchase (i) weaponized unmanned aerial vehicles; (ii) aircraft that are configured for combat or are combat-coded and have no established commercial flight application; (iii) grenades or similar explosives or grenade launchers from a surplus program operated by the federal government; (iv) armored multi-wheeled vehicles that are mine-resistant, ambush-protected, and configured for combat, also known as MRAPs, from a surplus program operated by the federal government; (v) bayonets; (vi) rifles of .50 caliber or higher; (vii) rifle ammunition of .50 caliber or higher; or (viii) weaponized tracked armored vehicles.

Nothing in this subsection shall restrict the acquisition or purchase of an armored high mobility multi-purpose wheeled vehicle, also known as HMMWVs, or preclude the seizure of any prohibited item in connection with a criminal investigation or proceeding or subject to a civil forfeiture. Any property obtained by seizure shall be disposed of at the conclusion of any investigation or as otherwise provided by law.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as prohibiting the acquisition, purchase, or otherwise acceptance of any personal protective equipment, naloxone or other lifesaving medication, or any personal property that is not specifically prohibited pursuant to subsection B from the federal government.

History.

1995, c. 149; 2020, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 37, 55; 2022, cc. 375, 376.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 1289, Item 403 K, as added by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2020, provides: “Notwithstanding the provisions of §§

2.2-5515

,

15.2-1721.1

, and

52-11.3

, a waiver from the Criminal Justice Services Board is only required for the continued use of rifles of .50 caliber or higher or ammunition of .50 caliber or higher for use in such rifles and not for other types of firearms or ammunition of .50 caliber or higher.”

Acts 2020, Sp. Sess. I, c. 37, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities; therefore, Chapter 1289 of the Acts of Assembly of 2020 requires the Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission to assign a minimum fiscal impact of $50,000. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation is $0 for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

Acts 2020, Sp. Sess. I, c. 55, cl. 2, effective March 1, 2021,
provides: “That the Department of Criminal Justice Services shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective within 280 days of its enactment.”

The 2020 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2020 amendments by Sp. Sess. I,
cc. 37 and 55, effective March 1, 2021, are nearly identical, and added the subsection A designation; substituted “U.S. Department of Defense” for “United States Department of Defense” in the first sentence of subsection A; and added subsections B and C.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 375 and 376 are identical, and in subsection B in the first paragraph, substituted “rifles” for “rifles” in clause (vi) and inserted “rifle” in clause (vii).

§ 52-11.4.
Disposal of unclaimed property in the possession of State Police; exemption from the Virginia Disposition of Unclaimed Property Act.

The Department of State Police may provide for (i) the public sale in accordance with the provisions of this section or (ii) the retention for use by the State Police or other law-enforcement agency of any unclaimed personal property that has been in the possession of the State Police and unclaimed for a period of more than 60 days. For the purposes of this section, “unclaimed personal property”
means any personal property, other than firearms or other weapons, belonging to another that has been acquired by a law-enforcement officer pursuant to his duties, that is not needed in any criminal prosecution, that has not been claimed by its rightful owner and that the State Treasurer has indicated will be declined if remitted under the Virginia Disposition of Unclaimed Property Act (§

55.1-2500

et seq.).

Prior to the sale or retention for use by the State Police of any unclaimed personal property, the Superintendent or his designee shall make reasonable attempts to (i) notify by mail the rightful owner of the property, (ii) obtain from the attorney for the Commonwealth of the jurisdiction in which the unclaimed item came into the possession of the State Police in writing a statement advising that the item is not needed in any criminal prosecution, (iii) cause to be published on the website maintained by the State Police for a period of 60 days notice that there will be a public display and sale of unclaimed personal property, including property selected for retention by the State Police, which shall be described generally in the notice, together with the date, time and place of the sale and shall be made available for public viewing at the sale, and (iv) cause to be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the locality where the sale is to be held once a week for two successive weeks prior to the sale, a notice that includes the date, time, place of the sale, general description of items to be sold and the State Police website address. The Superintendent or his designee shall pay from the proceeds of sale the costs of advertisement, removal, storage, investigation as to ownership and liens, and notice of sale. The balance of the funds shall be held by the Superintendent or his designee for the owner and paid to the owner upon satisfactory proof of ownership. Any unclaimed item retained for use by the State Police shall become the property of the Commonwealth and any property provided to other law-enforcement agencies shall become the property of the locality served by the agency and shall be retained only if, in the opinion of the Superintendent or chief law-enforcement officer, there is a legitimate use for the property by the agency and that retention of the item is a more economical alternative than purchase of a similar or equivalent item.

If no claim has been made by the owner for the property or proceeds of such sale within 60 days of the sale, the remaining funds shall be deposited in the Literary Fund of the Commonwealth and the retained property may be placed into use by the State Police or other law-enforcement agency. Any such owner shall be entitled to apply to the Commonwealth within one year from the date of the sale and, if timely application is made therefor and satisfactory proof of ownership of the funds or property is made, the Commonwealth shall pay the remaining proceeds of the sale or return the property to the owner without interest or other charges or compensation. No claim shall be made nor any suit, action or proceeding be instituted for the recovery of such funds or property after one year from the date of the sale.

History.

2004, c. 427.

Editor’s note.

To conform to the recodification of Title 55 by Acts 2019, c. 712, effective October 1, 2019, the following substitution was made at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission: substituted “Virginia Disposition of Unclaimed Property Act (§

55.1-2500

et seq.)” for “Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed Property Act (§ 55-210.1 et seq.).”

§ 52-11.5.
Disposal of unclaimed firearms or other weapons in possession of the State Police.

Subject to the provisions of §

19.2-386.29

, the State Police may destroy unclaimed firearms and other weapons that have been in the possession of the Department for a period of more than 120 days and that have been determined by the Superintendent or his designee to be unsuitable to be placed in service with the Department. For the purposes of this section, “unclaimed firearms and other weapons” means any firearm or other weapon belonging to another that has been acquired by a law-enforcement officer pursuant to his duties, that is not needed in any criminal prosecution, that has not been claimed by its rightful owner and that the State Treasurer has indicated will be declined if remitted under the Virginia Disposition of Unclaimed Property Act (§

55.1-2500

et seq.).

At the discretion of the Superintendent or his designee, unclaimed firearms or other weapons may be destroyed by any means that render the firearms or other weapons permanently inoperable. Prior to the destruction of such firearms or other weapons, the Superintendent or his designee shall comply with the notice provisions contained in §

52-11.4

.

In lieu of destroying any such unclaimed firearm, the Superintendent or his designee may donate the firearm to the Department of Forensic Science, upon agreement of the Department of Forensic Science.

History.

2004, c. 427; 2015, c. 220.

Editor’s note.

To conform to the recodification of Title 55 by Acts 2019, c. 712, effective October 1, 2019, the following substitution was made at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission: substituted “Virginia Disposition of Unclaimed Property Act (§

55.1-2500

et seq.” for “Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed Property Act (§ 55-210.1 et seq.).”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 220 substituted “120 days” for “60 days” in the first sentence and added the third paragraph.

§ 52-11.6.
Arrest or summons quota prohibited.

The Department of State Police shall not establish a formal or informal quota that requires a police officer to make a specific number of arrests or issue a specific number of summonses within a designated period of time.

The Department of State Police shall not use the number of arrests made or summonses issued by a police officer as the sole criterion for evaluating an officer’s job performance.

Nothing in this section shall preclude the Department of State Police from collecting, analyzing, and utilizing information concerning the number of arrests made or summonses issued for any other purpose.

History.

2022, cc. 209, 208.